Illinois, session 104th, SB1164.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Illinois Aeronautics Act is amended by 5changing Section 82 as follows: 6    (620 ILCS 5/82)  (from Ch. 15 1/2, par. 22.82)7    Sec. 82. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Illinois Aeronautics Act.9(Source: P.A. 96-328, eff. 8-11-09.)